Maine, session 132, LD1243.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §7851, sub-§3-A, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 176, §7, is
amended to read:
B. The department may issue more than one license at the same license level to an
applicant for an assisted living facility license or a residential care facility license that,
on October 1, 2023, held more than one license at the same license level for services
offered in the same location. The department may also issue more than one license at
the same license level to an applicant for an assisted living facility license or a
residential care facility license if the applicant received municipal approval and permits
and project financing approvals prior to March 1, 2023 and began construction, prior
to October 1, 2023, on a facility at the same license level for services offered in the
same location as long as there were no quality of care and services or resident rights
violations of the license substantiated prior to October 1, 2023.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR2297(03)